Louisiana, session 2026, HB1148.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:36 is hereby amended and enacted to read as follows:
§36. Powers of commission; limitations
In the course of any investigation or hearing held by the commission, it may
administer oaths or affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance,
examine them under oath or affirmation, and require the production of books,
records, documents, or other evidence deemed relevant or material to the
investigation or hearing. However, the commission shall not review a judicial
decision made during the deliberative process, a discretionary determination, or the
outcome of any application of law to the facts. Any determination made by the
commission or the supreme court regarding the deliberative process shall not be
taken as evidence of prior misconduct.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be given retroactive and prospective and
application.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1428 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1148
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.